Final source/morphy/foma/Noun-Fem-frontVowelMidVowel2.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols N +RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL 

LEXICON Root
NounFemFrontMidVowelStem2;

LEXICON NounFemFrontMidVowelStem2 

ඇතිනි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
උවැසි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
එකි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
කැකුළි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
කිකිළි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
කිඳුරි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
කිරිල්ලි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
කිවිඳි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
කුමරි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
කෙකිනි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
කෙවිලි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
කොමළි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
ගැබිනි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
ගැහැණි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;			
ගැහැනි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;			
ගෑණි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;		
ගෑනි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;		
ගිරවි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
ගෙවිලි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
දැරි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
නිළි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
පින්වති	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
පින්වන්ති	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
පෙම්වන්ති	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
බැමිණි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
බැළලි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
බිරි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
මනමාලි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
මනාලි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
මහත්මි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
මැකිණි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
මැතිනි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
මිත්තණි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
මිතුරි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
මියුලැසි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
මෙනෙවි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
මෙහෙණි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
මෙහෙසි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
මෝඩි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
යෙහෙළි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
ලි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
ලේලි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
වහලි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
වැඳිරි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
වැරදිකාරි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
වැලහින්නි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
සිසුවි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
සෙබළි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
හෙදි	NounFemFrontMidVowel2;
ළමිස්සි NounFemFrontMidVowel2;



LEXICON NounFemFrontMidVowel2

+N+RT: #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM:ය #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC:ය #;
+N+RT+SG+VOC:ය #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+CJ:යත්  #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+CJ:යත්  #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+FN:යයි  #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+FN:යයි  #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM:යක් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM+FN:යකි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM+CJ:යකුත් #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM:යෝ  #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM+CJ:යෝත්  #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM+FN:යෝයි  #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC:යක #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+CJ:යකත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+FN:යකයි #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC:යන්  #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC+CJ:යනුත්  #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC+FN:යනුයි  #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT:යට #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+CJ:යටත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+FN:යටයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT:යකට #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+CJ:යකටත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+FN:යකටයි #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT:යන්ට #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT+CJ:යන්ටත් #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT+FN:යන්ටයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL:යගෙන් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+CJ:යගෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+FN:යගෙනි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL:යකගෙන් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+CJ:යකගෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+FN:යකගෙනි #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL:යන්ගෙන් #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL+CJ:යන්ගෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL+FN:යන්ගෙනි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:යගේ #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:යගේත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:යගේයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:යගෙ #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:යගෙත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:යගෙයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN:යකගේ #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+CJ:යකගේත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+FN:යකගේයි #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN:යන්ගේ #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN+CJ:යන්ගේත් #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN+FN:යන්ගේයි #;
+N+RT+PL+VOC:යනි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:වගේත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:වගේයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:වගෙ #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:වගෙත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:වගෙයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN:වකගේ #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+CJ:වකගේත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+FN:වකගේයි #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN:වන්ගේ #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN+CJ:වන්ගේත් #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN+FN:වන්ගේයි #;
+N+RT+PL+VOC:වනි #;
